Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SYSTEM

CHAPTER 67. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT AUSTIN

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 67.01. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "University" means the University of Texas at Austin.

(2) "Board" means the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3159, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 67.02. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS AT AUSTIN. The University of Texas at Austin is a coeducational institution of higher education within The University of Texas System. It is under the management and control of the board of regents of The University of Texas System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3160, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 67.03. CAMPUS PEACE OFFICERS: CONCURRENT JURISDICTION. (a) Campus peace officers commissioned by the university have the same jurisdiction, powers, privileges, and immunities as provided by Section 51.203.

(b) Subsection (a) does not in any manner limit or reduce the jurisdiction, powers, privileges, and immunities provided by law for a law enforcement agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state, including the City of Austin police department, with territorial jurisdiction that includes all or part of the university campus. The law enforcement agency retains the autonomous authority to deploy agency personnel on university property and in university facilities in any manner consistent with the jurisdiction, powers, privileges, and immunities of the agency.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 492 (H.B. 479), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD

Sec. 67.22. MILITARY TRAINING. No student of the university shall ever be required to take a military training course as a condition for entrance into the university or for graduation from the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3160, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 67.23. TEXAS MEMORIAL MUSEUM. The board has the management and control of the Texas Memorial Museum. It shall be maintained as a museum and shall be an integral part of The University of Texas at Austin.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3160, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 67.24. RESEARCH AND EXPERIMENTATION FOR TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION. (a) The department may contract with the university for the university to conduct research relating to transportation, including the economics, planning, design, construction, maintenance, or operation of transportation facilities.

(b) An agreement entered into under this section is not subject to Chapter 771, Government Code.

(c) The comptroller may draw proper warrants in favor of the university based on vouchers or claims submitted by the university through the department covering reasonable fees and charges for services rendered by members of the staff of the university system to the department and for equipment and materials necessary for research and experimentation under a contract entered into under this section.

(d) The comptroller shall pay warrants issued under this section against any funds appropriated by the legislature to the department. The payments made to the university shall be credited and deposited to local institutional funds under its control.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Department" means the Texas Department of Transportation.

(2) "Transportation facilities" means highways, turnpikes, airports, railroads, including high-speed railroads, bicycle and pedestrian facilities, waterways, pipelines, electric utility facilities, communication lines and facilities, public transportation facilities, port facilities, and facilities appurtenant to other transportation facilities.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3161, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(29), eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 382, Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 5.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 67.25. SESQUICENTENNIAL MUSEUM. The University of Texas at Austin may contract with the Texas Sesquicentennial Museum Board to operate the Texas Sesquicentennial Museum.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2450, ch. 630, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 67.26. UNIVERSITY INTERSCHOLASTIC LEAGUE; VENUE FOR SUITS. Venue for suits brought against the University Interscholastic League or for suits involving the interpretation or enforcement of the rules or regulations of the University Interscholastic League shall be in Travis County, Texas. When the litigation involves a school district located within Travis County, it shall be heard by a visiting judge.

Added by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 12, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 2, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 107, Sec. 2.01, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 67.27. RESEARCH FACILITIES ON BALCONES TRACT. (a) Under the general authority of Section 65.39 of this code, the board is specifically authorized to lease vacant land on the Balcones Tract to a corporation created under the Texas Non-Profit Corporation Act (Article 1396-1.01, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes) for the scientific and educational purpose of assisting in the provision of research facilities for The University of Texas System and may include in the terms of the lease agreement provisions for the lease back of the land along with any facilities that may be constructed thereon by the nonprofit corporation.

(b) Insofar as permissible under federal laws and regulations, the board may obligate for payment to the nonprofit corporation under the terms of the lease agreement appropriate portions of federal or private funds to be received under the terms of federal or private research grants and contracts.

(c) The terms of the lease agreement shall provide for a termination date not more than 30 years from the date the lease agreement is entered into and shall further provide that ownership of facilities constructed on the leasehold estate shall revert to the board upon the expiration of the lease term.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 646, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

SUBCHAPTER C. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MCDONALD OBSERVATORY AT MOUNT LOCKE

Sec. 67.51. UNIT OF UNIVERSITY. The University of Texas McDonald Observatory at Mount Locke is a part of and under the direction and control of The University of Texas at Austin.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3161, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 67.52. PROGRAMS. The observatory shall conduct basic research in astronomy, along with optical and radio astronomy research, toward the establishment of a highly developed astronomy and space-science program, including the acquisition and support of the technical and maintenance staffs and facilities essential to the operation of an observatory of the first class, and may assist in the conduct of a comprehensive instructional program in astronomy and space science.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3361, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 67.53. VISITOR CENTER. The board may negotiate and contract with the Texas Department of Transportation and any other agency, department, or political subdivision of the state or any individual for the construction, maintenance, and operation of a visitor center and related facilities at McDonald Observatory at Mount Locke.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 370, ch. 161, Sec. 1, eff. May 8, 1975. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(30), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER D. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS MARINE SCIENCE INSTITUTE

Sec. 67.61. UNIT OF UNIVERSITY. The University of Texas Marine Science Institute is a part of and under the direction and control of The University of Texas at Austin.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3161, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 481, ch. 208, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1973.

Sec. 67.62. PROGRAMS, COURSES, FACILITIES. The institute shall conduct a comprehensive instructional program in marine science, resources, and engineering at the graduate level and offer undergraduate courses for those students interested in the marine environment, and perform basic and applied research in the marine environment; and may provide shore-based facilities, including, but not limited to, laboratories, boats, classrooms, dormitories, and a cafeteria for faculty and students who are engaged in studies of the marine environment.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3361, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 481, ch. 208, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1973.

SUBCHAPTER E. THE UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS BUREAU OF ECONOMIC GEOLOGY

Sec. 67.71. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "bureau" means The University of Texas Bureau of Economic Geology.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 871 (H.B. 2819), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 67.72. TEXNET TECHNICAL ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) In this section, "program" means the TexNet seismic monitoring program administered by the bureau.

(b) The TexNet Technical Advisory Committee is established as an advisory committee within the bureau.

(c) The advisory committee consists of nine members appointed by the governor who work or reside in this state, including:

(1) one representative of the Railroad Commission of Texas who specializes in seismology, geomechanical engineering, reservoir engineering, or another related field recommended to the governor by the executive director of the Railroad Commission of Texas; and

(2) at least three representatives from the oil and gas industry, not to include the representative appointed under Subdivision (1).

(d) The governor shall designate a member of the advisory committee as the chair of the advisory committee to serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the governor.

(e) A person affiliated with the bureau or under contract for services with the bureau may not serve as a voting member of the advisory committee.

(f) The director of the bureau shall serve, ex officio, as a nonvoting member of the advisory committee.

(g) The advisory committee shall:

(1) in coordination with the bureau, develop recommendations for a program of work to assist the program and any research efforts affiliated with the program in accomplishing the goals of the program, including recommendations regarding:

(A) the acquisition and deployment of equipment;

(B) contracting with vendors;

(C) determining the scope of research programs associated with the program; and

(D) determining the scope of any use of funds appropriated by the legislature for the program or associated research;

(2) review and approve or reject expenditures made in connection with the program;

(3) prepare and approve an annual budget for the use of any funds appropriated for the program by the legislature;

(4) provide oversight and input on the acquisition, deployment, and operation of new and existing program equipment;

(5) ensure that there is a monthly transmission of the data collected by seismic equipment operated under the program to the Incorporated Research Institutions for Seismology database; and

(6) meet with the bureau quarterly to discuss the progress of the program, expenditures made in connection with the program, and any other information related to the program that the advisory committee finds necessary.

(h) Not later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the advisory committee and the bureau jointly shall prepare and submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, and the speaker of the house of representatives a report that includes:

(1) a review of the use of any funds appropriated for the program by the legislature;

(2) a complete listing and accounting of all research funded through the program, including:

(A) a list of contractors employed under the program;

(B) an itemized budget for each program element; and

(C) a list of the geographic coverage of the program; and

(3) recommendations related to the ongoing operations and requirements of the program.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 448 (H.B. 632), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 67.73. IDENTIFICATION AND MAPPING OF AGGREGATE PRODUCTION OPERATIONS. (a) In this section, "aggregate production operation" has the meaning assigned by Section 28A.001, Water Code.

(b) The bureau shall:

(1) conduct a study to identify:

(A) locations in this state suitable for aggregate production operations; and

(B) existing land uses or planning policies of political subdivisions that could result in a location identified under Paragraph (A) becoming incompatible with use as an aggregate production operation;

(2) develop and maintain a database that:

(A) maps locations identified under Subdivision (1)(A) and Section 28A.052, Water Code; and

(B) is accessible to political subdivisions; and

(3) update the study and map described by Subdivisions (1) and (2) not less than once every 10 years.

(c) In fulfilling the duties described by Subsection (b), the bureau may cooperate with:

(1) the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality, the Texas Water Development Board, and any other state agency, political subdivision, or university with access to information related to aggregate production operations; and

(2) federal agencies or private entities as appropriate to fulfill the requirements of this section.

(d) An agency, political subdivision, or university described by Subsection (c)(1) shall provide to the bureau on request available information as necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.

(e) The bureau may accept gifts, grants, and donations from sources other than the state for the purpose of implementing this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 168 (S.B. 2196), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.